Maryland, session 2025, HB1075.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
3–301.
(b) The five voting members of the Calvert County Board shall be elected at a
general election as required by subsections (d) and (f) of this section.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1075*

HOUSE BILL 1075
(d) (1) Of the five voting members of the county board:
[(1)] (I) One shall be elected from each of the three county commissioner
districts, ELECTED ONLY BY THE VOTERS OF THAT DISTRICT; and
[(2)] (II) Two shall be elected from the county at large.
(2) (I) AS APPLICABLE FOR THAT COUNTY COMMISSIONER
DISTRICT, AT THE GENERAL ELECTION, THE BALLOT SHALL PROVIDE THE VOTER
WITH THE CHOICE TO CAST A VOTE “FOR” A CANDIDATE FOR ELECTION FROM THAT
DISTRICT.
(II) AFTER THE ELECTION RESULTS ARE CERTIFIED, THE STATE
BOARD OF ELECTIONS SHALL DECLARE FOR EACH DISTRICT WHETHER A
CANDIDATE HAS BEEN ELECTED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.